Wyoming, session 2025, HB0065.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-302(a)(ii) and 9-1-303(d) by
creating a new paragraph (iii) are amended to read:

9-1-302. Powers and duties; custodian of public
records; preservation of executive orders and proclamations
HB0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0009
of governor; removal of public documents prohibited;
exceptions.

(a) The secretary of state is the custodian of, and
shall preserve:

(ii) All executive orders issued by a governor,
proclamations of the governor proclaiming the effectiveness
of constitutional amendments, corporate revocations and any
other proclamation designated as a permanent record by the
governor. The secretary of state shall preserve all other
proclamations of the governor for one (1) year and then
deliver them to the department of state parks and cultural
resources for destruction or preservation as it deems
desirable. As used in this paragraph, "executive order"
means a proclamation or order executed by the governor
pursuant to constitutional or statutory authority to
implement any provision of law; provided "executive order"
does not include:

(A) A proclamation issued by the governor
calling a special session of the legislature;

HB0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0009
(B) A proclamation issued pursuant to
chapter 4 of title 8 of the Wyoming statutes;

(C) Any proclamation calling for an
election or the convening of a state convention pursuant to
W.S. 22-20-201;

(D) A proclamation of the adoption of a
constitutional amendment.

9-1-303. Powers and duties; affixing seal to and
countersigning commissions and documents; certified copies
of acts; file of commissions and appointments; publication
of documents.

(d) The secretary of state shall make the following
documents available to the public by publishing the
documents on the secretary of state's official website:

(iii) All executive orders, as defined in W.S.
9-1-302(a)(ii), issued by a governor.

HB0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0009
Section 2. Any executive order previously issued by a
Wyoming governor prior to the effective date of this act
that can be reasonably located shall be published on the
secretary of state's official website as soon as reasonably
practicable in accordance with this act. The requirements
of this section shall include executive orders that have
expired.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0065